Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3111
Rules and regulations.

The director may establish and from time to time amend such reasonable rules and regulations as are necessary to enable him to carry out his duties under sections 44-3101 to 44-3112.

Laws 1978, LB 656, § 11.